Massachusetts, session 194th, H4417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of Section 89 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the following words:-
“The board shall consist of 21 members,” and replacing it thereof with the following:- “The
board shall consist of 23 members,”
SECTION 2. Said subsection (b) of said Section 89 of said Chapter 119 is further
amended by inserting after the words "Massachusetts juvenile justice advisory committee or a
designee” the following:- "; 1 of whom shall be the executive director of the Commission on
Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Queer Youth or a designee".
SECTION 3. Said subsection (b) of said Section 89 of said Chapter 119 is further
amended by striking out the following words:- “2 of whom shall be parents whose children have
been subject to juvenile court jurisdiction and” and replacing it thereof with the following:-
“3 of whom shall be individuals with past juvenile justice involvement from a list
provided by The Transformation Center DBA Kiva Centers and a list provided by the
of 2

Parent/Professional Advocacy League, Inc, at least 2 of whom was a parent whose child has been
subject to juvenile court jurisdiction and 1 of whom is an adult who was subject to juvenile court
jurisdiction as a child, and”
of 2